Hawaii, session 2026, SB2811.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  There is established, within the department of accounting and general services for administrative purposes only, the state building permit process task force to evaluate the challenges, opportunities, and legislative actions necessary to establish a state building permit review office for state projects located on state-owned lands.  To expedite the construction of state projects, the task force shall develop a building permit review process with the following functions for the building of state projects on state-owned lands: (1)  Processing, reviewing, and approving building permit applications; (2)  Coordinating and processing associated reviews, approvals, and documentation among state and county agencies and utility companies, as necessary; (3)  Conducting inspections and undertaking permit enforcement actions; (4)  Maintaining building permit records; and (5)  Other actions as necessary to effectuate these functions; provided that any recommendations developed by the task force shall comply with and reflect the requirements under section 103-50, Hawaii Revised Statutes. (b) The task force shall comprise the following members: (1)  One member from the office of the governor, to be appointed by the governor; (2)  One member from the senate, to be appointed by the president of the senate; (3)  One member from the house of representatives, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; (4)  The comptroller, or their designee; (5)  The director of business, economic development, and tourism, or their designee; (6)  The chairperson of the board of land and natural resources, or their designee; (7)  The director of transportation, or their designee; (8)  The chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission, or their designee; (9)  The superintendent, or their designee; (10)  The executive director of the Hawaii community development authority, or their designee; (11)  The executive director of the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation, or their designee; (12)  The executive director of the Hawaii public housing authority, or their designee; (13)  The director of the office of planning and sustainable development, or their designee; (14)  The chairperson of the state building code council, or their designee; and (15)  The directors from the permitting department of each county, or their designees. (c) The members of the task force shall serve without compensation for their services, but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses, including travel expenses, incurred while participating in meetings and events. (d) The department of accounting and general services shall provide administrative support to the task force. (e) The task force shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than December 1, 2027. (f) The task force shall dissolve on June 30, 2028. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the staffing and administrative costs of the state building permit process task force established by section 1 of this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of accounting and general services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.